District of Columbia statutes.
42-3503.08

Tax exemption.

All monies received by any tenant through the Tenant Assistance Program under this subchapter are exempt from District income taxes payable under Chapter 18 of Title 47.

History

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 308, 32 DCR 3089

Cross References

Gross income and adjusted gross income, see § 47-1803.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2538.